Maine, session 132, LD273.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA §411, as enacted by PL 1975, c. 593, §3, is amended to read:
§411. Creation
Whenever When the Legislature delegates to a committee the power to administer
oaths, issue subpoenas and take depositions in connection with any study or investigation,
such that committee shall automatically become becomes an investigating committee for
the purpose of such the study or investigation and shall be is subject to the provisions of
this chapter, whether or not such that power is utilized used by the committee in the course
of such the study or investigation. When the Legislature delegates to a committee the
power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas and take depositions, the Legislature has the
sole authority to determine the membership and scope of that committee.